Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.108

Reporting disciplinary actions to national clearinghouse.

For the purposes of reporting disciplinary actions taken against certificated staff to other states via a national database used by the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the following actions shall be reported: Suspension, surrender, revocation, denial, stayed suspension, reinstatement, and any written reprimand related to abuse and sexual misconduct. These actions will only be reported to the extent that they are accepted by the national clearinghouse, but if there are categories not included, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall seek modification to the national clearinghouse format.

[ 2004 c 29 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—2004 c 29: See note following RCW 28A.400.301.